Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

40-15-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that it is the policy of the state of Colorado to promote a competitive telecommunications marketplace while protecting and maintaining the wide availability of high-quality telecommunications services. Such goals are best achieved by legislation that brings telecommunications regulation into the modern era by guaranteeing the affordability of basic telephone service while fostering free market competition within the telecommunications industry. The general assembly further finds that the technological advancements and increased customer choices for telecommunications services generated by such market competition will enhance Colorado's economic development and play a critical role in Colorado's economic future. However, the general assembly recognizes that the strength of competitive force varies widely between markets and products and services. Therefore, to foster, encourage, and accelerate the continuing emergence of a competitive telecommunications environment, the general assembly declares that flexible regulatory treatments are appropriate for different telecommunications services.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1476, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 15, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Advanced features" means custom calling features known as speed dialing, 3-way calling, call forwarding, and call waiting.

"Basic local exchange service" or "basic service" means the telecommunications service that provides:

A local dial tone;

Local usage necessary to place or receive a call within an exchange area; and

Access to emergency, operator, and interexchange telecommunications services.

(3.3) "Broadband" or "broadband service" means broadband internet service provided over a broadband network.

(3.5) "Broadband internet service" means a retail service that transmits and receives data from the customer's property or determined point of presence to substantially all internet endpoints. The term includes any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the operation of the broadband service.

(3.7) "Broadband network" means the plant, equipment, components, facilities, hardware, and software used to provide broadband internet service at measurable speeds of at least ten megabits per second downstream and one megabit per second upstream or at measurable speeds at least equal to the federal communications commission's definition of high-speed internet access or broadband, whichever is faster, with:

Sufficiently low latency to enable the use of real-time communications, including voice-over-internet-protocol service; and

Either no usage limits or usage limits that are reasonably comparable to those found in urban areas for the same technology.

"Centron and centron-like services" means services which provide custom switching features which include but are not limited to distributive dial tone, select number screening, toll restriction and screening, nonattendant busy out, nonattend and call transfer, and select trunk hunting and screening.

(4.5) "Commercial mobile radio service" or "CMRS" means cellular or wireless service, personal communications service, paging service, radio common carrier service, radio mobile service, or enhanced specialized mobile radio service.

"Commission" means the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

(5.5) "Competitive local exchange carrier" or "CLEC" means a local exchange provider that is not the incumbent local exchange carrier in an identified exchange area.

"Deregulated telecommunications services" means telecommunications services not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to part 4 of this article.

(6.5) and (6.7) Repealed.

"Emerging competitive telecommunications services" means telecommunications services subject to regulation by the commission pursuant to part 3 of this article.

"Exchange area" means a geographic area established by the commission that is used in providing basic local exchange service.

(8.5) "FCC" means the federal communications commission.

"Functionally equivalent" refers to services or products which perform the same or similar tasks or functions to obtain substantially the same result at reasonably comparable prices.

(9.3) "Incumbent local exchange carrier" or "ILEC" has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. sec. 251 (h).

(9.5) "Incumbent provider" means a provider that offers broadband internet service in an unserved area, but that is not providing a broadband network in that area.

"Information services" has the same meaning as set forth in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153.

(10.5) Repealed.

"Interexchange provider" means a person who provides interexchange telecommunications service.

"Interexchange telecommunications service" means telephone service between exchange areas that is not included in basic local exchange service.

"InterLATA" means telecommunications services between LATAs.

"InterLATA interexchange telecommunications service" means long-distance service between LATAs.

(14.5) "Internet-protocol-enabled service" or "IP-enabled service" means a service, functionality, or application, other than voice-over-internet protocol, that uses internet protocol or a successor protocol and enables an end user to send or receive a voice, data, or video communication in internet protocol format or a successor format, utilizing a broadband connection at the end user's location.

"IntraLATA" means telecommunications service provided within one LATA.

"IntraLATA interexchange telecommunications service" means long-distance service within a LATA.

"LATA" means each local access and transport area which has been designated in this state by the commission. A LATA may encompass more than one contiguous local exchange area in this state which serves common social, economic, or other purposes, even where such area transcends municipal or other local governmental boundaries.

(17.5) Repealed.

"Local exchange provider" or "local exchange carrier" means any person authorized by the commission to provide basic local exchange service.

"New products and services" means any new product or service introduced separately or in combination with other products and services after January 1, 1988, which is not functionally required to provide basic local exchange service and any new product or service which is introduced after January 1, 1988, which is not a repackaged current product or service or a direct replacement for a regulated product or service. Repackaging any product or service deregulated under part 4 of this article with any service regulated under part 2 or 3 of this article shall not be considered a new product or service.

(19.3) Repealed.

(19.5) "Nonoptional operator services" means operator services requiring an operator for individualized call processing or specialized or alternative billing, including, without limitation, credit card calls, calls billed to a third number, collect calls, and person-to-person calls, or operator services to provide telephone services to inmates at correctional facilities, as defined in section 17-42-103 (2).

"Operator services" means services, other than directory assistance, provided either by live operators or by the use of recordings or computer-voice interaction to enable customers to receive individualized and select telephone call processing or specialized or alternative billing functions. "Operator services" includes nonoptional operator services, optional operator services, and operator services necessary for the provision of basic local exchange service.

(20.3) "Operator services necessary for the provision of basic local exchange service" means operator services provided when operator intervention is required to complete a local call or obtain access to emergency services or to directory assistance.

(20.6) "Optional operator services" means operator services not defined in subsection (19.5) or (20.3) of this section, including, without limitation, operator services provided in connection with conference calling, foreign language translation, and voice messaging.

"Premium services" means any enhanced or improved product or service offered by a telecommunications service provider that is not functionally required for the provision of basic local exchange or interexchange service and that the customer may purchase at his or her option.

"Private line service" means any point-to-point or point-to-multipoint service dedicated to the exclusive use of an end user for the transmission of any telecommunications services.

"Private telecommunications network" means a system, including the construction, maintenance, or operation of such system, for the provision of telecommunications service, or any portion of such service, by a person or entity for the sole and exclusive use of such person or entity and not for resale, directly or indirectly.

Repealed.

Construction, maintenance, or operation of a private telecommunications network shall not constitute the provision of public utility service, and such network shall not be subject to any of the provisions of this article or of articles 1 to 7 of this title.

"Regulated telecommunications services" means telecommunications services treated as public utility services subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

(24.5) "Rural telecommunications provider" means a local exchange provider that meets one or more of the following conditions:

Provides common carrier service to any local exchange carrier study area, as defined by the commission, that does not include either:

Any incorporated place of ten thousand inhabitants or more, or any part thereof, based on the most recently available population statistics of the United States bureau of the census; or

Any territory, incorporated or unincorporated, included in an urbanized area, as defined by the United States bureau of the census as of August 10, 1993;

Provides telephone exchange service, including exchange access, to fewer than fifty thousand access lines;

Provides telephone exchange service to any local exchange carrier study area, as defined by the commission, with fewer than one hundred thousand access lines; or

Has less than fifteen percent of its access lines in communities of more than fifty thousand inhabitants.

"Special access" means any point-to-point or point-to-multipoint service provided by a local exchange provider dedicated to the exclusive use of any interexchange provider for the transmission of any telecommunications services.

"Special arrangements" means custom assemblies of optional manufactured products which allow users to select nonstandard interfaces and switched or dedicated facilities in combinations for select, specialized custom applications, including but not limited to combinations of microwave, coaxial or copper cable, fiber optics, multiplexing equipment, or specialized electronics. "Special arrangements" does not include access.

"Special assemblies" means services provided to customers who require special or nonstandard conditioning for interoffice or intraoffice connections or image-data use interruptions for combination lines.

"Switched access" means the services or facilities furnished by a telecommunications provider to interexchange providers that allow them to use the basic exchange network for origination or termination of interexchange telecommunications service.

"Telecommunications service" and "telecommunications" have the same meaning as set forth in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153.

Repealed.

"Toll service" means a type of telecommunications service, commonly known as long-distance service, that is provided on an intrastate basis and that is:

Not included as a part of basic local exchange service;

Provided between local calling areas; and

Billed to the customer separately from basic local exchange service.

"Unserved area" means an area of the state that:

Lies outside of municipal boundaries or is a city with a population of fewer than seven thousand five hundred inhabitants; and

Consists of households that lack access to at least one provider of a broadband network that uses satellite technology and at least one provider of a broadband network that uses nonsatellite technology.

"Unserved area" also means any portion of a state or interstate highway corridor that lacks access to a provider of a broadband network.

"Voice-over-internet protocol service" or "VoIP service" means a service that:

Enables real-time, two-way voice communications originating from or terminating at a user's location in internet protocol or a successor protocol;

Utilizes a broadband connection from the user's location; and

Permits a user to generally receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1477, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 94:

(19.5), (20.3), and (20.6) added and (20) amended, p. 1063, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 756, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 97:

(23) amended, p. 59, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 98:

(30) and (31) added, p. 845, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2000:

(24.5) added, p. 46, § 1, effective March 10; (20) amended, p. 418, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2003:

(19.5) and (20.6) amended, p. 2591, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(6.5) and (19.3) added, p. 465, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1), (23)(b), and (30) repealed, (5.5) and (8.5) added, and (8), (11), (12), (18), (21), (28), and IP(31) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 516, § 1, effective May 9; (3), (10), and (29) amended and (4.5), (14.5), and (33) added (HB 14-1329), ch. 150, p. 512, § 1, effective May 9; (3) and (29) amended and (9.3) added (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 523, § 1, effective May 9; (3.3), (3.5), (3.7), (6.7), (9.5), (10.5), (17.5), and (32) added (HB 14-1328), ch. 173, p. 629, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

IP, IP(3.7), and (32)(a) amended and (19.3) repealed, (SB 18-002), ch. 89, p. 706, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(17.5) amended, (HB 20-1137), ch. 241, p. 1162, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(19.5) and (20.6) amended, (HB 21-1201), ch. 389, p. 2599, § 4, effective June 30; (6.5), (6.7), (10.5), and (17.5) repealed, (HB 21-1109), ch. 489, pp. 3526, 3528, §§ 4, 9, effective July 7.

40-15-103. Application of part.

The provisions of this part 1 shall apply throughout this article, unless specifically otherwise stated.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1479, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-104. Powers of local government.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede any existing powers of a local government.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1479, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-105. Nondiscriminatory access charges.

No local exchange provider shall, as to its pricing and provision of access, make or grant any preference or advantage to any person providing telecommunications service between exchanges nor subject any such person to, nor itself take advantage of, any prejudice or competitive disadvantage for providing access to the local exchange network. Access charges by a local exchange provider shall be cost-based, as determined by the commission, but shall not exceed its average price by rate element and by type of access in effect in the state of Colorado on July 1, 1987.

At its option, any rural telecommunications provider may, in lieu of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, remain under the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to part 2 of this article. A rural telecommunications provider operating under this subsection (2) may at any time apply to the commission for regulatory relief under section 40-15-203 or 40-15-207. Such rural telecommunications provider, upon the granting of regulatory relief, shall provide access services under the conditions established in subsection (1) of this section; except that the commission shall set the maximum price for access services for such provider.

Contracts for access pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be filed with the commission and open to review by other purchasers of such access to assure compliance with the provisions of this section. Prior to such review, the purchaser desiring such review shall execute a nondisclosure agreement as determined by the commission for the protection of business and trade secrets.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1479, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 47, § 2, effective March 10.

40-15-106. Cross-subsidization prohibited - illegal restraint of trade.

The price of telecommunications services or products which are not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall not be priced below cost by use of subsidization from customers of services and products subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, and any such cross-subsidization is deemed to be an illegal restraint of trade subject to the provisions of article 4 of title 6, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1479, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-107. Powers of commission - inspection of books and documents - confidentiality of information obtained through audit.

The commission shall administer and enforce all provisions of this article, and, in addition to any other powers under articles 1 to 7 of this title, the commission has the right to inspect the books and documents of the local exchange provider. The local exchange provider shall supply additional relevant and material information to the commission as needed. In addition, the commission has the right to inspect the books and records of any affiliate of a local exchange provider which provides telecommunications service under part 2, 3, or 4 of this article, if, in the provision of such service, the affiliate uses a plant or incurs costs that are joint and common to the provision of any basic local exchange service of the local exchange provider regulated under part 2 of this article.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), all information, documents, and copies thereof provided to the commission, a commissioner, or any person employed by the commission in connection with an audit, whether such audit is conducted pursuant to this section or pursuant to any other authority granted to the commission by law, shall be given confidential treatment and shall not be made public by the commission or any other person without either:

The prior written consent of the person providing such information, documents, or copies; or

A court order issued pursuant to section 24-72-204 (5), C.R.S.

This subsection (2) shall not be construed to shield from disclosure information, documents, and copies thereof that are in the commission's possession through the exercise of the commission's audit authority and that are otherwise subject to disclosure under the Colorado open records law, part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The commission may consider whether to change the status of reports provided to it on a nonconfidential basis.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 184, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2003:

(3) added, p. 2591, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(3) repealed, (HB 21-1201), ch. 389, p. 2599, § 5, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-105 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-108. Cost methodologies.

Any local exchange provider which provides facilities or equipment for use by interstate users or providers of telecommunications services shall separate all investments and expenses associated therewith according to applicable federal separations procedures and agreements.

Any provider of telecommunications service which offers both regulated and deregulated telecommunications service shall segregate its intrastate investments and expenses in accordance with allocation methodologies as prescribed by the commission to ensure that deregulated telecommunications services are not subsidized by regulated telecommunications services.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-109. Assurance of interconnections - averaging of rates.

If a local exchange provider does not have interconnection with an interexchange provider, the commission may order any provider of interexchange service in the state to interconnect with the local exchange provider. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall require a rural telecommunications provider to provide interexchange telecommunications service.

All providers of interexchange voice grade telecommunications service shall average their interexchange voice grade rates on a statewide basis. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit volume discounts or other discounts in promotional offerings.

The commission may provide for just and equitable compensation upon application of an interexchange provider subject to subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 47, § 3, effective March 10.

40-15-110. Provision of regulated and deregulated service.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to preclude a single entity from offering and providing services under parts 2, 3, and 4 of this article.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1480, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-111. Regulation of the discontinuation or rearrangement of basic local exchange service - measured or message rate service not required.

Every local exchange provider shall continue to offer and provide basic local exchange service in any exchange area it serves immediately prior to July 2, 1996, unless the commission determines that an alternative provider offers or provides functionally equivalent service to the customers in such exchange area.

Rearrangements of exchange areas shall require a determination by the commission that such rearrangement will promote the public interest and welfare and will not adversely impact the public switched network of the affected local exchange provider or such provider's financial integrity.

Measured or message rate service for end user customers shall not be required in order for such customers to obtain basic local exchange service unless the commission so orders.

A telecommunications provider shall not base its charges for basic local exchange service on the volume or amount of data or voice traffic of an individual subscriber except with the prior approval of the commission following notice and the opportunity for a hearing.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 755, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 185, § 2, effective March 31.

40-15-112. Unauthorized change of telecommunications provider.

No provider of telecommunications service shall request the transfer of a customer's account, wholly or in part, to another provider of the same or a similar telecommunications service unless one or more of the following conditions has been met:

The provider to whom the customer's account is to be transferred has obtained from the customer a document, signed by the customer, that contains a clear, conspicuous, and unequivocal request by the customer for a change of provider; or

The provider to whom the customer's account is to be transferred has obtained the customer's oral authorization for the transfer and can furnish proof of such authorization through verification by an independent third party, electronic records, or any other manner prescribed by the commission by rule.

If the customer is not an individual, a document, authorization, or request referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be valid only if given by an authorized representative of the customer, who shall provide proof of such authority.

A document shall not be valid under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section if it is presented to the customer for signature in connection with a sweepstakes or other game of chance.

A telecommunications provider who initiates an unauthorized change in a customer's telecommunications provider in violation of this section is liable:

To the customer, the customer's previously selected provider, or both, as determined by the commission, for all intrastate long distance charges, interstate long distance charges, local exchange service charges, provider switching fees, the value of any premiums to which the customer would have been entitled, and other relevant charges incurred by the customer during the period of the unauthorized change; and

To the customer's local exchange provider for the change fees for the unauthorized change and reinstating the customer to the original provider.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 843, § 1, effective May 26.

40-15-113. Unauthorized charge for services.

A provider of telecommunications service shall not engage in the following activities:

Charging a customer for goods or services without the customer's authorization;

Adding charges for goods or services to the customer's bill without the customer's authorization; or

When providing billing services for a telecommunications provider, knowingly or recklessly participating in charging or billing a customer for goods or services without the customer's authorization to add the goods or services to the customer's bill; except that, in accordance with federal law, this paragraph (c) does not apply to a provider of CMRS services.

A customer is not liable for an amount charged in violation of this section.

The commission shall maintain and keep available data on the incidence of complaints in violation of this section.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 121, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 517, § 2, effective May 9.